test/src/morphology/N-caacc_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čääˊcc a-stem vesi: # Noun - full paradigm
     čääˊcc+N+Sg+Nom: čääˊcc
     čääˊcc+N+Sg+Gen: čääˊʒʒ
     čääˊcc+N+Sg+Acc: čääˊʒʒ
     čääˊcc+N+Sg+Ill: čäcca
     čääˊcc+N+Sg+Loc: čääˊʒʒest
     čääˊcc+N+Sg+Com: čaaˊʒʒin
     čääˊcc+N+Ess: čääˊccen
     čääˊcc+N+Par: čääˊʒʒed
     čääˊcc+N+Sg+Abe: čääˊʒʒtää
     čääˊcc+N+Pl+Nom: čääˊʒʒ
     čääˊcc+N+Pl+Gen: čaaˊʒʒi
     čääˊcc+N+Pl+Acc: čaaˊʒʒid
     čääˊcc+N+Pl+Ill: čaaˊʒʒid
     čääˊcc+N+Pl+Loc: čaaˊʒʒin
     čääˊcc+N+Pl+Com: čaaˊʒʒivuiˊm
     čääˊcc+N+Pl+Abe: čaaˊʒʒitää
